Illinois, session 104th, HB1399.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Public Health Powers and 5Duties Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is 6amended by adding Section 2310-438 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2310/2310-438 new)8    Sec. 2310-438. Safe gun storage; Secretary of State driver 9services facilities; dissemination by the Department.10    (a) The Department shall ensure that safe gun storage 11information is available at all Secretary of State driver 12services facilities. 13    (b) The Department may use existing public or private 14programs to implement this Section.15    (c) The Department shall disseminate safe gun storage 16information on its website and in Department facilities.  17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 181, 2026.